Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.320

Schedule of payments.

The department shall provide each compensation board with the approved maximum schedule of payments for injury or death prescribed in chapter 51.32 RCW: PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter shall be construed as establishing any liability on the part of the department of labor and industries.

[ 1986 c 266 s 37; 1984 c 38 s 33; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 34; 1953 c 223 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.